Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1859.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 6105(a)(2)(ii), (a.1)(3) and (5), (c)(10) and (f)(4)(i) of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended and subsections (a.1) and (c) are amended by adding paragraphs to read:§ 6105. Persons not to possess, use, manufacture, control, sell or transfer firearms.(a) Offense defined.--* * *12345678910111213141516171819 (2) * * *(ii) This paragraph shall not apply to any person whose disability is imposed pursuant to subsection (c)(6) or (10).* * *(a.1) Penalty.--* * *(2.1) A person who is the subject of an extreme risk protection order issued under 42 Pa.C.S. Ch. 64A (relating to extreme risk protection orders) commits a misdemeanor of the second degree if he intentionally or knowingly fails to relinquish a firearm or firearms license as required by the order.(3) (i) A person commits a misdemeanor of the third degree if he intentionally or knowingly accepts possession of a firearm, other weapon or ammunition from another person he knows is the subject of an active final protection from abuse order issued pursuant to 23 Pa.C.S. § 6108 or an active protection from abuse order issued pursuant to 23 Pa.C.S. § 6107(b), which order provided for the relinquishment of the firearm, other weapon or ammunition during the period of time the order is in effect[.], or intentionally or knowingly accepts possession of a firearm or firearms license from a person he knows is the subject of an extreme risk protection order issued under 42 Pa.C.S. Ch. 64A.(ii) This paragraph shall not apply to:(A) a third party who accepts possession of a firearm, other weapon or ammunition relinquished pursuant to 23 Pa.C.S. § 6108.3; or20250HB1859PN2302 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (B) a dealer licensed pursuant to section 6113 (relating to licensing of dealers) or subsequent purchaser from a dealer licensed pursuant to section 6113, who accepts possession of a firearm, other weapon or ammunition relinquished pursuant to 23 Pa.C.S. § 6108.2 or 42 Pa.C.S. Ch. 64A.* * *(5) A person who has accepted possession of a firearm, other weapon or ammunition pursuant to 23 Pa.C.S. § 6108.3 or who possesses a firearm or firearms license under 42 Pa.C.S. Ch. 64A commits a misdemeanor of the [first] second degree if he intentionally or knowingly returns a firearm, other weapon or ammunition to a defendant or respondent or intentionally or knowingly allows a defendant or respondent to have access to the firearm, other weapon or ammunition prior to [either] any of the following:(i) The sheriff accepts return of the safekeeping permit issued to the party pursuant to 23 Pa.C.S. § 6108.3(d)(1)(i).(ii) The issuance of a court order pursuant to subsection (f)(2) or 23 Pa.C.S. § 6108.1(b) (relating to return of relinquished firearms, other weapons and ammunition and additional relief) which modifies a valid protection from abuse order issued pursuant to 23 Pa.C.S. § 6108, which order provided for the relinquishment of the firearm, other weapon or ammunition by allowing the defendant to take possession of the firearm, other weapon or ammunition that had previously been ordered relinquished.(iii) The expiration of an extreme risk protection 20250HB1859PN2302 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 order or the issuance of a court order that terminates an extreme risk protection order under 42 Pa.C.S. Ch. 64A.* * *(c) Other persons.--In addition to any person who has been convicted of any offense listed under subsection (b), the following persons shall be subject to the prohibition of subsection (a):* * *(10) A person who has been convicted of an offense under subsection [(a.1)(2)] (a.1)(2.1) or (5). The prohibition shall terminate five years after the date of conviction, final release from confinement or final release from supervision, whichever is later.(11) A person who is the subject of an active extreme risk protection order issued under 42 Pa.C.S. Ch. 64A.* * *(f) Other exemptions and proceedings.--* * *(4) (i) The owner of any seized or confiscated firearms or of any firearms ordered relinquished under 23 Pa.C.S. § 6108 or 42 Pa.C.S. Ch. 64A shall be provided with a signed and dated written receipt by the appropriate law enforcement agency. This receipt shall include, but not limited to, a detailed identifying description indicating the serial number and condition of the firearm. In addition, the appropriate law enforcement agency shall be liable to the lawful owner of said confiscated, seized or relinquished firearm for any loss, damage or substantial decrease in value of said firearm that is a direct result of a lack of reasonable care by the appropriate law 20250HB1859PN2302 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 enforcement agency.* * *Section 2. Section 6128(a) heading and introductory paragraph of Title 18 are amended to read:§ 6128. Abandonment of firearms, weapons or ammunition.(a) [General rule] Abandonment.--Firearms, weapons or ammunition which are itemized on a list required under 23 Pa.C.S. § 6108(a)(7)(v) (relating to relief) or the possession or acquisition of which is prohibited under 42 Pa.C.S. Ch. 64A (relating to extreme risk protection orders) or 18 U.S.C. § 922(g)(9) (relating to unlawful acts) and relinquished into or otherwise coming into the custody of a police department, Pennsylvania State Police, coroner, medical examiner, district attorney, sheriff or licensed dealer shall be deemed abandoned when:* * *Section 3. Section 1126 of Title 42 is amended to read:§ 1126. Masters.The President Judge of the Philadelphia Municipal Court may appoint attorneys who are members of the Pennsylvania Bar to serve as masters in proceedings under Chapter 64A (relating to extreme risk protection orders) or 23 Pa.C.S. Ch. 61 (relating to protection from abuse).Section 4. Title 42 is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 64AEXTREME RISK PROTECTION ORDERSSec.64A01. Scope of chapter.64A02. Definitions.64A03. Preliminary matters.20250HB1859PN2302 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 64A04. Petition for extreme risk protection order.64A05. Interim extreme risk protection order.64A06. Hearing on petition.64A07. Notice to law enforcement.64A08. Service.64A09. Order after hearing.64A10. Termination hearing.64A11. Extension of order.64A12. Relinquishment of firearms.64A13. Return of firearms.64A14. False allegations by petitioner.64A15. Employment protection.64A16. Mental health and chemical dependency services.64A17. Instructional and informational material.§ 64A01. Scope of chapter.This chapter relates to extreme risk protection orders.§ 64A02. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Court." A court of common pleas in this Commonwealth."Extreme risk protection order." A court order prohibiting a person from having in the person's possession or control, purchasing or receiving or attempting to purchase or receive a firearm, based upon a finding that the person presents a substantial risk of suicide or of causing the death of, or serious bodily injury to, another person."Family or household member." Spouses or persons who have been spouses, persons living as spouses or who lived as spouses, parents and children, other persons related by consanguinity or 20250HB1859PN2302 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 affinity, current or former sexual or intimate partners or persons who share biological parenthood."Firearm." A weapon designed to or that may readily be converted to expel a projectile by the action of an explosive or the frame or receiver of such weapon."Firearms dealer" or "dealer." A person licensed to sell firearms under 18 Pa.C.S. § 6113 (relating to licensing of dealers)."Firearms license" or "license." A concealed carry license issued under 18 Pa.C.S. § 6109 (relating to licenses), safekeeping license issued under 23 Pa.C.S. § 6108.3 (relating to relinquishment to third party for safekeeping), hunting license required under 34 Pa.C.S. § 2701 (relating to license requirements) or any similar license issued pursuant to the laws of another state."Hearing officer." A magisterial district judge, judge of the Philadelphia Municipal Court, arraignment court magistrate appointed under section 1123 (relating to jurisdiction and venue), master appointed under section 1126 (relating to masters) and master for emergency relief."Law enforcement officer." An officer of the United States, of another state or political subdivision thereof or of the Commonwealth or political subdivision thereof who is empowered by law to conduct investigations of or to make an arrest for an offense enumerated in this chapter or an equivalent crime in another jurisdiction and an attorney authorized by law to prosecute or participate in the prosecution of such offense."Serious bodily injury." Bodily injury that creates a substantial risk of death or causes serious, permanent disfigurement or protracted loss or impairment of the function 20250HB1859PN2302 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of a bodily member or organ.§ 64A03. Preliminary matters.(a) Standing.--A law enforcement officer or a family or household member of a person believed to present a risk of suicide or of causing the death of, or extreme bodily injury to, another person may file a petition requesting that the court issue an extreme risk protection order or renew an existing extreme risk protection order.(b) Filing fee.--No filing fee may be charged for a petition under this chapter.(c) Effect of service.--An extreme risk protection order is effective at the time of service.(d) Right to counsel.--A respondent under this chapter shall have the right to be represented by counsel. If the respondent cannot afford an attorney and meets the income guidelines applicable to representation by a public defender in a criminal case, the court shall appoint counsel upon the request of the respondent.§ 64A04. Petition for extreme risk protection order.(a) Petition.--(1) A petition for an extreme risk protection order shall:(i) be standardized and developed by the Office of Attorney General as required under section 64A17 (relating to instructional and informational material);(ii) be verified under the Pennsylvania Rules of Civil Procedure, and a person signing the petition shall be subject to penalties under 18 Pa.C.S. § 4904 (relating to unsworn falsification to authorities);(iii) at a minimum, state facts that demonstrate the 20250HB1859PN2302 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 risk presented by the respondent's ability to purchase firearms or have possession or control of firearms; and(iv) describe the number, types and locations of any firearms known or believed to be owned by the respondent or known or believed to be in the respondent's possession or control.(2) If the court is closed or is unavailable during the business day, a petition may be filed with a hearing officer.(b) Evidence of risk.--The court or hearing officer may consider all relevant evidence, but in no case shall an order be issued under this chapter absent a demonstration of risk due to behaviors or events occurring in the preceding 12 months.(c) Factors.--In determining whether grounds exist to issue an extreme risk protection order, the court or hearing officer shall consider evidence of the following and the recency of any behaviors or events:(1) Suicide threats or attempts.(2) Threats or acts of violence or attempted acts of violence.(3) Domestic abuse, including any violation of a protection from abuse order, under 23 Pa.C.S. Ch. 61 (relating to protection from abuse) or a similar law in another state.(4) Cruelty to animals under 18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 55 Subch. B (relating to cruelty to animals) or a similar law in another state.(5) Abuse of controlled substances or alcohol, or any criminal offense that involves controlled substances or alcohol.(6) Unlawful or reckless use, display or brandishing of 20250HB1859PN2302 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 a firearm.(7) Recent acquisition or attempted acquisition of a firearm.(8) Any additional information the court finds to be reliable, if it is otherwise admissible, including a statement by the respondent.§ 64A05. Interim extreme risk protection order.(a) Rule.--The court or hearing officer reviewing a petition shall issue an interim extreme risk protection order if it finds, by a preponderance of the evidence, that:(1) the respondent presents a substantial risk of suicide or of causing the death of, or serious bodily injury to, another person; and(2) the risk is imminent and other circumstances that would make it safe to proceed by ordering a hearing under section 64A06 (relating to hearing on petition) without issuing an interim extreme risk protection order do not exist.(b) Contents of order.--An interim extreme risk protection order shall include:(1) The date and time the order was issued.(2) Instructions for relinquishment of any firearm or firearms license that the respondent owns or that is in the respondent's possession or control.(3) Notice of the penalties for violating the order.(4) Notice of the provisions of 18 Pa.C.S. § 6128 (relating to abandonment of firearms, weapons or ammunition).(5) If the order was issued by a court and a hearing is scheduled under subsection (d), the following:(i) notice of the time, date and location of the 20250HB1859PN2302 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 hearing;(ii) notice of the right to request a continuance and instructions on requesting a continuance or waiving the hearing;(iii) notice of the fact that, at the hearing, or if the hearing is waived, the court may extend the order for up to one year; and(iv) notice of the right to an attorney under section 64A03 (relating to preliminary matters).(6) If the order was issued by a hearing officer, notice of the date upon which the order will expire.(c) Duration.--An interim extreme risk protection order issued by a hearing officer shall expire at the end of the next business day the court deems itself available, but not more than five days after the issuance of the interim order. An interim extreme risk protection order issued by a court shall be in effect until the hearing under subsection (d).(d) Hearing following interim order.--If the court orders an interim extreme risk protection order under subsection (a), the court shall conduct a hearing on the petition within 10 days of the date of the interim order.(e) Request for continuance.--The respondent may request a continuance on a hearing scheduled to take place after the issuance of an interim order, which the court shall grant. No hearing shall be continued except with the consent of the respondent.§ 64A06. Hearing on petition.(a) Rule.--Upon reviewing a petition filed under section 64A04 (relating to petition for extreme risk protection order), the court may issue an order for a hearing on the petition, 20250HB1859PN2302 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 which shall be conducted within 10 days of the date of the petition.(b) Request for continuance.--If the hearing is scheduled to take place fewer than three business days after service of the order, the court shall grant a continuance until at least three business days after service if requested by the respondent. The court shall notify the respondent of the respondent's right to a continuance under this subsection.(c) Failure to appear.--If the respondent waives the right to be present at a hearing or fails to appear for a hearing on a petition scheduled under this section, the court may proceed with the hearing and may issue an extreme risk protection order in the respondent's absence.§ 64A07. Notice to law enforcement.(a) Notice.--The court or hearing officer issuing an order under this chapter shall cause a copy of the order to be delivered to the sheriff, the local law enforcement agency and the Pennsylvania State Police.(b) Entry into database.--Upon receipt of the order, the Pennsylvania State Police shall cause the order to be entered into the appropriate database so that notice of the order is provided through the Pennsylvania Instant Check System and the Federal Bureau of Investigation National Instant Criminal Background Check System.§ 64A08. Service.(a) Service.--Service of an extreme risk protection order or an order for a hearing shall be made in person by the sheriff or a law enforcement officer, as directed by the court or hearing officer issuing the order. At the time of service, the sheriff or law enforcement officer shall provide the respondent with a 20250HB1859PN2302 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 copy of the petition.(b) Return.--Immediately upon completion of service of an extreme risk protection order, the sheriff or law enforcement officer completing service shall make a return of service to the court and shall provide a copy of the return of service to the petitioner.§ 64A09. Order after hearing.(a) Hearing and order.--The court shall issue an extreme risk protection order after conducting a hearing ordered under section 64A05 (relating to interim extreme risk protection order) or 64A06 (relating to hearing on petition), or after the respondent waives the right to a hearing under section 64A05, if the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that the respondent presents a substantial risk of suicide or of causing the death of, or serious bodily injury to, another person.(b) Duration.--An extreme risk protection order issued after a hearing shall be made effective for not less than three months nor more than one year.(c) Contents of order.--The order shall include:(1) The date and time the order was issued.(2) Notice of the right to petition the court for a termination of the order.(3) Instructions for relinquishment of any firearm that the respondent owns or that is in the respondent's possession or control, and any firearms license that is issued to the respondent.(4) Notice of the provisions of 18 Pa.C.S. § 6128 (relating to abandonment of firearms, weapons or ammunition).(5) Notice of the penalties for violating the order.(6) Notice of the right to appeal to the Superior Court 20250HB1859PN2302 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 within 30 days.(d) Explanatory opinion.--The court shall issue a separate, nonpublic explanatory opinion and shall provide the opinion to the petitioner and respondent within seven days of the issuance of the order.§ 64A10. Termination hearing.(a) Petition.--A respondent subject to an extreme risk protection order may petition the court at any time during the effective period of the order for a hearing to determine whether the order should be terminated.(b) Notice.--Upon receipt of a request for a termination hearing, the court shall set a date for the hearing and shall provide notice of the hearing to the petitioner, the local law enforcement agency and the Pennsylvania State Police.(c) Hearing.--The court shall conduct a hearing and issue an order on a petition to terminate an extreme risk protection order within 10 business days of receiving the petition.(d) Burden of proof.--At a termination hearing, the respondent seeking termination of the order shall have the burden of proving, by a preponderance of the evidence, that the order was issued in error or that circumstances have changed, and that the respondent does not present a substantial risk of suicide or of causing the death of, or serious bodily injury to, another person.§ 64A11. Extension of order.A petition to extend an extreme risk protection order shall state facts that support an extension of the order. The court may deny the petition based on the information stated in the petition or may schedule a hearing. The court shall provide notice of the hearing to the petitioner, the respondent, the 20250HB1859PN2302 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 local law enforcement agency and the Pennsylvania State Police. If the court finds by clear and convincing evidence, based on factors specified under section 64A04 (relating to petition for extreme risk protection order), that the respondent continues to present a substantial risk of suicide or of causing the death of, or serious bodily injury to, another person, the court shall extend the extreme risk protection order for a duration of no fewer than three months and no more than one year from the date of the order.§ 64A12. Relinquishment of firearms.(a) Rule.--An extreme risk protection order issued under section 64A05 (relating to interim extreme risk protection order) or 64A09 (relating to order after hearing) shall require the relinquishment of all firearms owned by the respondent or in the respondent's possession or control within 24 hours following service of the order, except for cause shown, in which case the court or hearing officer issuing the order shall specify the time for relinquishment of any or all of the respondent's firearms.(b) Relinquishment upon service.--A law enforcement officer or sheriff serving an extreme risk protection order shall request that all firearms and any firearms license in the respondent's possession or control be immediately relinquished into the custody of the law enforcement officer or sheriff. A law enforcement officer taking custody of a firearm or firearms license under this subsection shall transfer the firearm or firearms license to the sheriff or to a firearms dealer for safekeeping.(c) Subsequent relinquishment.--A respondent shall, within the time frame specified in the order, relinquish to the sheriff 20250HB1859PN2302 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or a firearms dealer any firearm or license remaining in the respondent's possession or control after the time of service. A respondent relinquishing a firearm directly to a dealer shall, within the time frame specified in the order, provide to the law enforcement agency or sheriff a copy of the affidavit described in subsection (f) in lieu of the firearm listed in the affidavit. A sheriff accepting an affidavit in lieu of a firearm shall file a copy with the court.(d) Receipt.--A sheriff or law enforcement officer taking custody of a firearm or license from a respondent shall provide the respondent with a copy of a signed and dated receipt. The receipt shall include a detailed description of each firearm and its condition. The sheriff or law enforcement officer issuing the receipt shall file the original receipt with the court.(e) Transfer to firearms dealer.--A respondent whose firearm is in the custody of a sheriff may request that the firearm be transferred to a firearms dealer for consignment sale, lawful transfer or safekeeping. Upon receiving the request, the sheriff shall transport the firearm to a dealer at no cost to the respondent or the dealer.(f) Affidavit.--A firearms dealer accepting custody of a firearm under this chapter shall provide the respondent, sheriff or law enforcement officer from which the dealer accepts custody with an affidavit on a form prescribed by the Pennsylvania State Police. A sheriff or law enforcement officer delivering custody of a firearm to a dealer shall file a copy of the affidavit with the court.(g) Contents of affidavit.--The affidavit shall include the following:(1) The caption of the case in which the extreme risk 20250HB1859PN2302 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 protection order was issued.(2) The name, address, date of birth and Social Security number of the respondent.(3) A list of all firearms relinquished to the dealer and a detailed description of each firearm, including its condition and, if applicable, the manufacturer, model and serial number.(4) The name and license number of the dealer and the address of the licensed premises.(5) An acknowledgment that the dealer will not return a firearm to the respondent while the respondent is subject to an extreme risk protection order.(6) An acknowledgment that the firearm, if sold or transferred, will be sold or transferred in compliance with 18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 61 (relating to firearms and other dangerous articles), and that no firearm will be returned to a respondent or any third party until the dealer has independently confirmed that the person requesting return of the firearm is legally eligible to possess firearms under Federal and State law.§ 64A13. Return of firearms.(a) Return to respondent.--Subject to subsection (c), if, following a hearing, a court vacates an interim extreme risk protection order, the court shall order the immediate return of all relinquished firearms and licenses to the respondent. Upon termination or expiration of an extreme risk protection order, the respondent may request that the sheriff or firearms dealer in possession of a relinquished firearm or license return the firearm or license. Subject to subsection (c), the sheriff or dealer shall return the firearm or license to the respondent as 20250HB1859PN2302 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 soon as possible, but not later than the end of the next business day after the day on which the respondent makes the request.(b) Third party claims.--A third party may request the return of a relinquished firearm at any time by providing proof of ownership and a sworn affidavit. Proof of ownership may consist of a statement in the affidavit. The affidavit shall affirm the following:(1) The third party will not recklessly, knowingly or intentionally return a firearm to a person subject to an extreme risk protection order nor intentionally or knowingly allow a person subject to an extreme risk protection order to have access to a firearm.(2) The third party understands that intentionally or knowingly allowing a person subject to an extreme risk protection order to have access to a firearm constitutes a misdemeanor of the second degree under 18 Pa.C.S. § 6105(a.1) (relating to persons not to possess, use, manufacture, control, sell or transfer firearms), punishable by up to two years' imprisonment and up to a $5,000 fine and resulting in a five-year prohibition on firearm acquisition or possession.(3) If the third party is a member of the household of a person who is subject to an extreme risk protection order, that any firearm returned to the third party will be stored either in a gun safe to which the person does not have and will not be permitted to access, or in a location outside the home to which the person does not have access.(c) Background check.--Prior to returning a firearm to any person other than a licensed dealer, the sheriff or firearms dealer in possession of the firearm shall independently confirm 20250HB1859PN2302 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 that the person requesting return of the firearm is legally eligible to possess firearms under Federal and State law. The sheriff or dealer receiving a request under subsection (a) shall conduct the required background check as soon as possible, but not later than the end of the next business day after the day on which the respondent makes the request.§ 64A14. False allegations by petitioner.(a) Offense.--It shall be a felony of the third degree for a petitioner to knowingly, intentionally or recklessly make a false statement under this section for an improper purpose.(b) Restitution.--A person convicted of false reporting or false swearing in a petition as determined by the court to have acted in bad faith for the purpose of harassing the respondent shall be ordered to pay full restitution to the respondent. For purposes of this section, restitution shall include, but not be limited to, reasonable attorney fees, costs of storage and other expenses incurred by the respondent as a result of the false reporting or false swearing.§ 64A15. Employment protection.(a) Protection.--No public employee who is subject to an extreme risk protection order may be terminated from employment based upon the prohibition of possessing a firearm.(b) Construction.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit an employer from discharging or otherwise disciplining a public employee for reasons other than the prohibition of possessing a firearm.§ 64A16. Mental health and chemical dependency services.During any proceeding under this chapter, the court shall consider whether a mental health or chemical dependency evaluation or any proceeding under the act of July 9, 1976 20250HB1859PN2302 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (P.L.817, No.143), known as the Mental Health Procedures Act, is necessary, and may order an evaluation or proceeding as it deems necessary.§ 64A17. Instructional and informational material.The Office of Attorney General shall develop and prepare instructions and informational brochures, standard petitions and extreme risk protection order forms and a staff handbook on the extreme risk protection order process. The following apply:(1) The standard petition and order forms or petitions or forms which are substantially similar must be used for all petitions filed and orders issued under this chapter.(2) The instructions, brochures, forms and handbook shall be prepared in consultation with interested persons, including representatives of gun violence prevention groups, judges and law enforcement personnel. Materials shall be based on best practices and available electronically online to the public.(3) The instructions shall be designed to assist petitioners in completing the petition and include a sample of a standard petition and order for protection forms.(4) The instructions and standard petition shall include a means for a petitioner to identify, with only lay knowledge, the firearms the respondent may own, possess, receive or have in the respondent's custody or control. The instructions shall provide pictures of types of firearms that a petitioner may choose from to identify the relevant firearms or an equivalent means to allow a petitioner to identify firearms without requiring specific or technical knowledge regarding firearms.(5) The informational brochure shall describe the use of 20250HB1859PN2302 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and the process for obtaining, modifying and terminating an extreme risk protection order under this chapter and provide relevant forms.(6) The extreme risk protection order form shall include, in a conspicuous location, notice of criminal penalties resulting from violation of the order and the following statement:You have the sole responsibility to avoid or refrain from violating this order's provisions. Only the court can change the order and only upon written application.(7) The staff handbook shall allow for the addition of a community resource list by the clerk of court. All clerks of court may create a community resource list of crisis intervention, mental health, substance abuse, interpreter, counseling and other relevant resources serving the county in which the court is located. The clerk of court may make the community resource list available as part of or in addition to the informational brochure described in this section.(8) The Office of Attorney General shall distribute a master copy of the petition and order forms, instructions and informational brochures to all clerks of court and shall distribute a master copy of the petition and order forms to all superior, district and municipal courts. Distribution of all documents shall, at a minimum, be in an electronic format or formats accessible to all courts and clerks of court in this Commonwealth.(9) The Office of Attorney General shall determine the significant non-English-speaking or limited-English-speaking populations in this Commonwealth. The Office of Attorney 20250HB1859PN2302 - 21 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 General shall arrange for translation of the instructions and informational brochures required by this section, which shall contain a sample of the standard petition and order for protection forms, into the languages spoken by those significant non-English-speaking populations and shall distribute a master copy of the translated instructions and informational brochures to all clerks of court within one year of the effective date of this paragraph.(10) The Office of Attorney General shall update the instructions, brochures, standard petition and extreme risk protection order forms and staff handbook as necessary, including when changes in the law necessitate an update.Section 5. This act shall take effect in 90 days.20250HB1859PN2302 - 22 - 12345678910111213